Hawaii, session 2026, SB968.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part III, subpart C, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-     Teacher loan forgiveness program; established.  (a)  There is established a teacher loan forgiveness program to be administered by the department, in partnership with a financial institution whose operations are principally conducted in Hawaii, to provide financial support to individuals who agree to teach as full-time teachers for two years in the Hawaii public school system; provided that priority shall be given for applications from individuals who agree to teach at a school located in a rural area in the State, as determined by the superintendent. (b)  An individual applying for the teacher loan forgiveness program shall obtain a license from the Hawaii teacher standards board prior to submitting an application. (c)  An application for the teacher loan forgiveness program shall be made within the first year of the applicant being employed as a full-time teacher in the Hawaii public school system; provided that an application may be submitted before the applicant commences employment, subject to subsection (b).  The application shall include the start date of the employment or the expected start date of the employment. (d)  Subject to available funds, the department shall deny or tentatively approve each application within ninety days of submission.  For each tentatively approved application, the department shall inform the applicant: (1)  Of the loan amount to be forgiven; provided that the board shall determine the amount, subject to a maximum of $           per individual; (2)  That the applicant is required to teach full-time in the Hawaii public school system for two years in order to be eligible for the teacher loan forgiveness program; and (3)  Of any other requirements established by the department. (e)  The department shall periodically monitor the employment with the department of each applicant who has obtained a tentatively approved application under subsection (d). After an applicant has satisfied all requirements under the teacher loan forgiveness program, the department shall award funds to the applicant; provided that if an applicant has not satisfied all requirements under the teacher loan forgiveness program within four years of the start date in the application, the department shall deny that application and inform the applicant of that denial. (f)  The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to implement the teacher loan forgiveness program." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the teacher loan forgiveness program established pursuant to section 302A-   , Hawaii Revised Statutes. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________